California statutes. Public Utilities Code
If no protests are filed or the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board the board shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the terms and conditions and proceed with the annexation in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

26687.

If protests against the proposed annexation are sustained, all proceedings shall be dismissed and no proceedings shall be undertaken again concerning the territory or any part thereof until after the expiration of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by Unincorporated Territory [27011. - 27016.]

27011.

The board shall cause an election to be held in the territory proposed to be annexed on the next established election date not less than 74 days after it has finally approved the terms and conditions of annexation to determine whether the territory shall be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

27012.

Notice of election shall be published and shall either state that a copy of the ordinance containing the terms and conditions of annexation at length is on file in the office of the secretary of the district, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or itself set forth the terms and conditions of annexation at length, in the discretion of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27013.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows:Shall the territory described in the petition filed with the secretary of the ____________ transit district on the ________ day of ________ be annexed to the transit district in accordance with and subject to all of the terms and
 conditions set forth in that certain ordinance passed by the board of directors of the transit district on the _______ day of ________, a copy of which is now on file in the office of the secretary of the transit district?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27014.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions set forth in the ordinance shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27015.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27016.

If the proposition is defeated by the voters, no annexation proceeding shall be commenced involving the territory or any part thereof until after the expiration of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [27041. - 27041.]

27041.

In the event the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters the board shall pass a resolution declaring the territory annexed to the district, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State, from and after the date of which filing with the Secretary of State the annexation of the territory to the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Annexation Without Election [27061. - 27063.]

27061.

Unincorporated territory may be annexed to a district without an election in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27062.

A petition describing the territory proposed to be annexed and requesting that proceedings be taken for its annexation shall be signed by all of the owners of the real property described therein, verified by the affidavit of one of the petitioners, addressed to the board, and filed with the secretary of the district. If a portion of the territory consists of public highways, streets, roads or paths, it shall not be necessary to secure the signatures to the petition of the owners only of the real property occupied by such public highways, streets, roads or paths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27063.

Proceedings shall thereafter be taken and a hearing held in substantial compliance with the provisions of this chapter relating to the annexation of unincorporated territory except that no election shall be held within the territory proposed to be annexed and the territory shall be deemed annexed to the district upon the passage of a resolution of the board declaring the territory annexed and the filing of a certified copy thereof with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Effect of Annexation [27091. - 27091.]

27091.

From and after the date of annexation the board shall levy upon all of the property in the territory annexed any taxes, tolls, or charges which are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the territory or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this division to be levied and collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Contest of Annexation [27111. - 27111.]

27111.

The validity of any proceedings for the annexation of any unincorporated territory to any district shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Exclusion of Territory [27251. - 27302.]



  ARTICLE 1. Exclusion of Unincorporated Territory [27251. - 27259.]

27251.

Any territory contained within a district not being served by any transit facilities of the district and not included within the boundaries of any incorporated city and not benefited in any manner by the district or by its continued inclusion therein may be excluded therefrom by order of the board upon the verified petition of the owners in fee of lands whose assessed value with improvements is in excess of one-half of the assessed value of all the lands with improvements held in private ownership in the territory sought to be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27252.

The petition shall describe the territory sought to be excluded and shall set forth that the territory is not benefited in any manner by the district or by its continued inclusion therein, and shall pray that the territory be excluded from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27253.

The petition shall be filed with the secretary of the district and shall be accompanied by a deposit with the secretary of the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) to meet the expenses of advertising and other costs incident to the proceedings for the exclusion of the territory, including the cost of recording a certified copy of the order provided for in this chapter. Any unconsumed balance of the deposit shall be returned to the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27254.

Upon the filing of the petition the secretary shall cause it to be set for hearing at a regular or adjourned regular meeting of the board and shall cause a notice of the filing thereof to be published. The notice shall also state the date of the filing of the petition and that it will come on for hearing before the board and shall state the time and place of the hearing. The time fixed for hearing shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice. The property to be excluded may or may not be specifically described in the notice, but if not described the notice shall refer to the petition on file with the secretary for a particular
 description of the property sought to be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27255.

Any landowner or taxpayer within the district may appear at the hearing either in behalf of or in opposition to the granting of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27256.

The petition shall come on for hearing before the board at the time and place specified in the notice of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27257.

If upon the hearing the board determines that it is for the best interests of the district that the lands mentioned in the petition or some portion thereof be excluded from the district, or if it appears that the lands or some portion thereof will not be benefited by their continued inclusion in this district, then the board shall make an order that the lands, or such portion thereof as the board may determine, be excluded from the district, describing specifically the lands so excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27258.

A copy of the order of exclusion certified by the secretary of the district shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the lands are situated. The record of the certified copy is prima facie evidence of the exclusion from the district of the lands purporting to be excluded thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27259.

From and after the making of the order of exclusion and the record thereof the lands excluded are no longer included in the district. The order of exclusion does not invalidate in any manner any taxes or assessments theretofore levied or assessed against the lands excluded nor relieve the property excluded from any outstanding bonds which are a lien thereon at the time of exclusion, nor from any taxes to pay the principal or interest thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusion of Incorporated Territory [27281. - 27284.]

27281.

If the city to which any territory included in any district has been annexed already provides transit service in the territory annexed, or if any territory in any district is annexed to a city, not a part of any district as originally established pursuant to this part, and not annexed thereto pursuant to this part, the city council or other governing body of the city may petition the district for the exclusion of such territory from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27282.

The petition shall contain the information prescribed for petitions for exclusion under Article 1 of this chapter, a deposit for expenses shall be made as therein provided, and thereafter all proceedings shall be had as provided therein for such petitions after filing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27283.

If an order of exclusion is granted, the board and the governing body of the city shall by contract provide for the payment by the city of the proportion of the taxes and bonded indebtedness for which the territory excluded is justly liable. If they do not agree, either may petition the superior court in and for the county in which the property is located for a judgment declaring the proportion of the taxes and bonded indebtedness for which the territory excluded is justly liable. The proceeding shall be governed by the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to declaratory relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

27284.

The order of exclusion does not invalidate in any manner any taxes or assessments theretofore levied or assessed against the lands excluded nor relieve the property excluded from any outstanding bonds which are a lien thereon at the time of exclusion, nor from any taxes to pay the principal or interest thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exclusion of Territory Within or Without City [27291. - 27302.]

27291.

The provisions of this article are alternative to any other provisions for the exclusion of territory from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27292.

Any time after the defeat of a bond issue by the voters of the district any city or unincorporated territory, a majority of whose voters voting on a district bond issue proposition voted against said proposition, may be excluded by order of the board upon receipt by the board of a verified petition of ten percent (10%) of the total vote cast in the territory proposed to be excluded, or of a resolution adopted by the city council or board of supervisors having jurisdiction of the territory. However, no city shall be divided and not less than one-half of the territory under the jurisdiction of the board of supervisors and then remaining within the district shall be included
 in any petition or resolution or combination thereof filed simultaneously, nor shall any territory be excluded by any petition or resolution or combination thereof which creates areas of noncontiguous territory or will be entirely surrounded by the remainder of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27293.

The petition or resolution shall state the reasons for the proposed exclusion and that the area will not be benefited by inclusion in the district, shall define the boundaries of the area proposed to be excluded, and request that the area be excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27294.

(a) If the exclusion is initiated by a city council or a board of supervisors, such legislative body shall hold a public hearing on the proposal to adopt the resolution. A notice of the hearing shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the area proposed to be excluded, or in a newspaper published within the city and county the legislative body of which has initiated the proceedings, in the event that a newspaper is not published in the area.

(b) The notice of the hearing shall be entitled “Proposal to Exclude the ________ Territory from the ________
 Transit District.” The territory shall be designated by an appropriate name descriptive of the area proposed to be excluded. The notice shall also contain a description of the area, state the time and place for a hearing by the legislative body, and shall state that all persons interested in the exclusion may attend and be heard. The hearing shall be held not less than 10 days after publication of the required notice.

(c) The legislative body shall conduct the hearing and at its conclusion, or at the conclusion of a further hearing to which adjournment has been made, may adopt the resolution and transmit it to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27295.

Within 60 days after the receipt of a petition for exclusion, the board shall hear the petition or resolution at a regular or adjourned meeting of the board. Notice of the filing of the petition or resolution shall be given by publication of the petition or resolution in a newspaper of general circulation, published in the district and selected by the board. The notice shall also state the date of the filing of the petition or resolution and that it will be considered by the board, and shall state the time and place of the hearing. The time fixed for the hearing shall not be less than 20 days from the date of the first publication of the notice. The property to be
 excluded may or may not be specifically described in the notice, but if not described, the notice shall refer to the petition or resolution on file for purposes of a particular description of the property sought to be excluded and shall make reference to the property by a descriptive name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27296.

Any landowner or taxpayer within the district may appear at the hearing, either in behalf of or in opposition to the granting of the petition or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27297.

The petition or resolution shall be heard by the board at the time and place specified in the notice of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27298.

If, upon the hearing the board determines that it is in the best interests of the district that the lands mentioned in the petition or resolution, or some portion of them, be excluded from the district, or if it appears that the lands, or some portion of them, will not be benefited by their continued inclusion in the district, the board shall make an order that the lands, or some portion of them, as the board may determine, be excluded from the district, describing specifically the lands excluded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27299.

In the event that the board shall not make the order excluding all of the area proposed to be excluded within 10 days after the hearing on the petition or resolution for exclusion, the board shall within 120 days thereof order and conduct an election within the area proposed to be excluded upon the question of whether the area shall be excluded from the district, however, if a general election is to be held within the territory proposed to be excluded within six months after the petition or resolution is filed with the secretary of the district the board may consolidate the election requested by this article with the general election. All resident electors of the area
 shall be eligible to vote at the election. The cost of the election shall be borne by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27300.

In the event that a majority of the votes cast at the election are in favor of the exclusion, the board, upon completion of the canvass, shall make an order excluding the area from the district. In the event that a majority of the votes cast at the election are opposed to the exclusion, the measure fails and no proceedings for exclusion of the area may be subsequently initiated within one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27301.

A copy of the order of exclusion, certified by the secretary of the district, shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the lands are situated. The record of the certified copy shall be prima facie evidence of the exclusion from the district of the lands which are purported to be excluded thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27302.

Subsequent to the making and recording of the order of exclusion, the lands excluded shall no longer be a part of the district.

The order of exclusion does not invalidate, in any manner, taxes or assessments previously levied or assessed against the lands excluded, nor relieve the property excluded from any outstanding bonds which are a lien upon the excluded property at the time of exclusion or from any taxes imposed to pay the principal or interest on the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Special Transit Service Districts [27401. - 27481.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proposal of Formation [27401. - 27406.]

27401.

One or more special transit service districts may be created within the boundaries of a district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27402.

Resolutions shall first be passed by the legislative bodies of half or more, but of not less than two, of the public agencies, within all or any part of the area which would be included in the proposed special transit service district, declaring that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special transit service district and describing its boundaries. The boundaries of the proposed special transit service district may include territory outside any such public agency if the territory is within the area of the transit district. When the entire area of a public agency is to be included in the special transit service district it may be described in the
 resolutions by name. Certified copies of the resolutions shall be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27403.

As an alternative to the instigation of the formation of a special transit service district by resolutions, a petition may be filed with the secretary of a district signed by voters within the proposed special transit service district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast. The boundaries of the proposed special transit service district shall be described in the petition and shall include at least two public agencies or portions thereof. A statement of the name of any public agency constitutes a sufficient and legal description of the territory if the entire area of the agency is included.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27404.

The petition shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special transit service district within the area of the district described in the petition. The petition may include one or more separate documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27405.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures on the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and shall certify to the board as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27406.

The board may initiate proceedings for the creation of a special transit service district within the area of the district by passing a resolution declaring that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special transit service district, and describing its boundaries, which shall include all or any part of two or more public agencies. A public agency to be included may be described by name if the entire area of the agency is included. No certified copy of the resolution need be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [27411. - 27417.]

27411.

Within 60 days after receipt of the resolutions of the public agencies or receipt of the certification of the sufficiency of a petition by the secretary of the district, or the passage of the resolution of the board, the board shall, by resolution, designate the special transit service district as “________ (here insert name) Transit District, Special Transit Service District No. ________ (here insert number)” (all such special transit service districts shall be numbered consecutively) and shall fix a time and place for a hearing on the proposed creation of the special transit service district, and shall publish notice of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27412.

The notice of hearing shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27413.

The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than 20 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27414.

At or before the hearing, any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the creation of the special transit service district or to the inclusion of his property therein. Upon the hearing the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of the adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27415.

The board may reduce or enlarge the boundaries of the proposed special transit service district, but the boundaries of the proposed special transit service district shall be within the boundaries of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27416.

The board shall not approve the creation of a special transit service district containing territory in addition to the territory included in the resolutions or petitions filed with the secretary of the district, or in its own resolution, until notice of its intention to include such additional territory has been published for the time and in the manner prescribed for the original hearing on the matter and a hearing is had pursuant to the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27417.

If no protests are filed, or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall by resolution approve the creation of the special transit service district either as originally described or as revised by the board and, except as provided by Article 3 (commencing at Section 27421), shall by resolution order and declare the special transit service district created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [27421. - 27430.]

27421.

Any public agency included, or partly included, within the boundaries of a special transit service district may, by a resolution adopted by its legislative body, adopted within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution creating a special transit service district, require the submission of a proposition to the voters of the public agency, or portion thereof, for the purpose of determining whether the public agency, or portion thereof, will be included within the boundaries of the special transit service district. However, no election shall be held, if the board, pursuant to Section 27417, excludes from the territory to be annexed the whole or any portion of a public
 agency in accordance with the petition or resolution adopted by the legislative body of the public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27422.

Instead of the procedure by resolution of a public agency, a petition may be filed with the secretary of the district, signed by voters within any public agency, or portion thereof, included within the boundaries of the special transit service district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the vote cast, requiring an election to be held as described in Section 27421 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27423.

The petition may include one or more documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name affixed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be. The petition shall be filed within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution creating a special transit service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27424.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official and shall certify to the board as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

27425.

The filing of a resolution pursuant to Section 27421, or of a petition pursuant to Section 27422, shall stay the effective creation of the special transit service district within the public agency or portion thereof included in the resolution or petition until the results of the required election are canvassed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27426.

The board shall call the election required by Sections 27421 and 27422 to be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days after the petition or resolution is filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

27427.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto the following: Shall the “(giving name of special transit service district)” be created and established in “(giving name of public agency or portion thereof)”?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27428.

No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the public agency or portion thereof requesting the election. The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county or city election and may be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27429.

The costs of the election required by this article shall be borne equally by the public agency and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27430.

The question of the creation of a special transit service district, submitted to a vote pursuant to this article, shall be canvassed separately for each public agency or portion thereof in which an election is held, and the board shall order and declare the special transit service district created, including each public agency, or portion thereof, in which no election was held pursuant to Section 27426 and also including each public agency, or portion thereof, in which an election was held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of creating the special transit service district voted in favor of the proposition, and excluding each public agency, or
 portion thereof, in which an election was held and in which a majority of those who voted upon the proposition of creating the special transit service district voted against the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Taxing Subdivision [27441. - 27441.]

27441.

A special transit service district has no separate corporate existence, but shall be deemed to be a taxing subdivision of the district, and within each special transit service district the board may levy and collect or cause to be collected taxes for any lawful purpose in accordance with Article 8 (commencing at Section 25891) of Chapter 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Bond Election [27451. - 27456.]

27451.

At any time after the adoption by the board of the resolution creating a special transit service district, notwithstanding the effective date of the resolution, the board may provide for the submission of a proposition for the incurring of a bonded indebtedness to be incurred by the district on behalf of the special transit service district to pay the costs of acquiring, constructing, or completing the whole or any portion of any transit facilities, or for acquiring any works, lands, structures, rights, equipment, or other property necessary or convenient to carry out the objects, purposes or powers of the district within the boundaries of a special transit service
 district created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27452.

The proposition for incurring a bonded indebtedness under Section 27451 may be submitted to the voters of any public agency or portion thereof at the same election as a proposition to create the special transit service district within a public agency or portion thereof, held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing at Section 27421). In such event a proposition for incurring a bonded indebtedness shall be submitted at a separate special bond election in all portions of the special transit service district in which no election is held pursuant to Article 3 (commencing at Section 27421).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27453.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing at Section 26201) shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of bonds under this article, including, among other things and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the calling, holding, and consolidation of the bond election, the formation, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds, and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27454.

The favorable vote of a majority of all the voters voting on the proposition to authorize the issuance of bonds at the election or elections held pursuant to Sections 27451 or 27452 within the special transit service district as finally established is required to authorize the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27455.

Only the property in the special transit service district shall be taxable for the payment of the principal and interest on special transit service district bonds. Until the bonds are paid, taxes shall be levied in substantial compliance with Section 25893.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27456.

Any proceeding denying the validity of the creation of any special transit service district, or of any bonds authorized by the voters thereof, pursuant to this part, shall be brought within three months after the date upon which the applicable resolution is adopted by the board or the applicable proposition is approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Annexation [27461. - 27473.]

27461.

Any public agency or portion thereof within the boundaries of a district, hereafter referred to collectively as “territory,” not included within the boundaries of a special transit service district, may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27462.

The board shall, by resolution, determine that the annexation of the territory will facilitate the acquisition or operation of transit facilities for the special transit service district, describe the territory, declare its intention to annex the territory to the special transit service district, set forth the terms and conditions upon which the territory shall be annexed, fix the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation, and provide for notice of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27463.

Any public agency or portion thereof included as part of the territory to be annexed to a special transit service district pursuant to this article may, by resolution of its legislative body, or a petition of its voters filed prior to the hearing on annexation, require the submission of an annexation proposition to the voters of the public agency, or portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27464.

Except as otherwise provided herein, Article 3 (commencing at Section 27421) shall govern the procedure for the submitting of the annexation proposition to the voters of any public agency or portion thereof involved; provided, that no election shall be held if the board, pursuant to Section 27468, excludes from the territory to be annexed the whole or any portion of a public agency in accordance with its petition or resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27465.

The terms and conditions for the annexation of territory to a special transit service district may provide (among other things) for the payment of taxes within the territory to be annexed, in addition to the taxes otherwise provided for in this part, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere, within the special transit service district, the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the territory proposed to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27466.

Notice fixing the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation of territory to a special transit service district shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27467.

The time for hearing shall be not less than 20 nor more than 60 days from the date of the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27468.

At or before the hearing, any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the annexation of the territory to the special transit service district or to the inclusion of his property. Upon the hearing, the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27469.

The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment. In the event that no protests are filed or the protests filed are overruled and denied, the board shall, by resolution, declare the territory, or a portion thereof, annexed to the special transit service district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

27470.
